Maryland, session 2026, HB0962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
13–505.
(a) In this section, “contested election committee” means a contested election
committee established under Title 12, Subtitle 3 of this article.
(b) (1) Subject to the provisions of this section, the governing body of a county
may establish, by law, a system of public campaign financing for:
(I) elective offices in the executive or legislative branches of county
government; OR
(II) ELECTED MEMBERS OF THE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0962*

HOUSE BILL 962
(2) A system of public financing established under paragraph (1) of this
subsection may include public financing of a contested election committee.
(3) When establishing a system of public campaign financing for [elective
offices in the executive or legislative branches of county government] AN OFFICE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the governing body of a county shall:
(i) specify the criteria that are to be used to determine whether an
individual is eligible for public campaign financing; and
(ii) provide the funding and staff necessary for the operation,
administration, and auditing of the system of public campaign financing.
(c) A system of public campaign financing enacted under subsection (b) of this
section:
(1) shall provide for participation of candidates in public campaign
financing on a strictly voluntary basis;
(2) may not regulate candidates who choose not to participate in public
campaign financing;
(3) shall prohibit the use of public campaign financing for any campaign
except a campaign for [county] LOCAL elective office;
(4) shall require a candidate who accepts public campaign financing to:
(i) establish a campaign finance entity solely for the campaign for
[county] LOCAL elective office; and
(ii) use funds from that campaign finance entity only for the
campaign for [county] LOCAL elective office;
(5) shall prohibit a candidate who accepts public campaign financing from
transferring funds:
(i) to the campaign finance entity established to finance the
campaign for [county] LOCAL elective office from any other campaign finance entity
established for the candidate; and
(ii) from the campaign finance entity established to finance the
campaign for [county] LOCAL elective office to any other campaign finance entity;
(6) shall provide for a public election fund for [county] LOCAL elective
offices that is administered by the chief financial officer of the county; and

HOUSE BILL 962 3
(7) shall be subject to regulation and oversight by the State Board to ensure
conformity with State law and policy to the extent practicable.
(d) A system of public campaign financing enacted under subsection (b) of this
section may:
(1) provide for more stringent regulation of campaign finance activity by
candidates who choose to accept public campaign financing, including contributions,
expenditures, reporting, and campaign material, than is provided for by State law;
(2) provide for administrative penalties for violations, in accordance with §
10–202 of the Local Government Article; and
(3) allow a publicly financed candidate to transfer any amount of funds
from the candidate’s campaign finance entity to the candidate’s contested election
committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.